California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) A county board of supervisors may, after consulting with affected local agencies within the county’s boundaries, provide by ordinance that the initial base year value for replacement grapevines that are planted to replace grapevines less than 15 years of age that were removed solely as a result of phylloxera infestation or Pierce’s Disease, and are planted on the same parcel as the replaced grapevines, as certified in writing by the county agricultural commissioner, shall be the base year value of the removed grapevines factored to the lien date of the first taxable year of the replacement grapevines. The assignment of base year replacement value shall be limited to that portion of the replacement grapevines that are substantially equivalent to the grapevines that were replaced, if the replacement grapevines are planted at a greater density.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Change in Ownership and Purchase [60. - 69.6.]

60.

A “change in ownership” means a transfer of a present interest in real property, including the beneficial use thereof, the value of which is substantially equal to the value of the fee interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

61.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 62, change in ownership, as defined in Section 60, includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The creation, renewal, sublease, assignment, or other transfer of the right to produce or extract oil, gas, or other minerals regardless of the period during which the right may be exercised. The balance of the property, other than the mineral rights, shall not be reappraised pursuant to this section.

(b) The creation, renewal, extension, or assignment of a taxable possessory interest in tax exempt real property for any term. For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) “Renewal” and “extension” do not include the granting of an option to renew or extend an existing agreement pursuant to which the term of possession of the existing agreement would, upon exercise of the option, be lengthened, whether the option is granted in the original agreement or subsequent thereto.

(2) Any “renewal” or “extension” of a possessory interest during the reasonably anticipated term of possession used by the assessor to value that interest does not cause a change in ownership until the end of the reasonably anticipated term of possession used by the assessor to value that interest. At the end of the reasonably anticipated term of possession used by the assessor, a new base year value, based on a new reasonably anticipated term of possession, shall be established for the possessory interest.

(3) “Assignment” of a possessory interest means the
 transfer of all rights held by a transferor in a possessory interest.

(c) (1) (A) The creation of a leasehold interest in taxable real property for a term of 35 years or more (including renewal options).

(B) The termination of a leasehold interest in taxable real property which had an original term of 35 years or more (including renewal options).

(C) Any transfer of a leasehold interest having a remaining term of 35 years or more (including renewal options).

(D) Any transfer of a lessor’s interest in taxable real property subject to a lease with a remaining term (including renewal options) of less than 35 years.

(2) Only that portion of a
 property subject to that lease or transfer shall be considered to have undergone a change in ownership.

(3) For the purpose of this subdivision, for 1979–80 and each year thereafter, it shall be conclusively presumed that all homes eligible for the homeowners’ exemption, other than manufactured homes located on rented or leased land and subject to taxation pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800) and floating homes subject to taxation pursuant to Section 229, that are on leased land have a renewal option of at least 35 years on the lease of that land, whether or not in fact that renewal option exists in any contract or agreement.

(d) (1) (A) A sublease of a taxable possessory interest in tax-exempt real property for a term, including renewal options, that exceeds half the length of the remaining term of the leasehold, including
 renewal options.

(B) The termination of a sublease of a taxable possessory interest in tax-exempt property with an original term, including renewal options, that exceeds half the length of the remaining term of the leasehold, including renewal options.

(C) Any transfer of a sublessee’s interest with a remaining term, including renewal options, that exceeds half of the remaining term of the leasehold.

(2) Any transfer of a possessory interest in tax-exempt real property subject to a sublease with a remaining term, including renewal options, that does not exceed half the remaining term of the leasehold, including renewal options.

(e) The creation, transfer, or termination of any joint tenancy interest, except as provided in subdivision (f) of Section 62,
 and in Section 63 and Section 65.

(f) The creation, transfer, or termination of any tenancy-in-common interest, except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 62 and in Section 63.

(g) Any vesting of the right to possession or enjoyment of a remainder or reversionary interest that occurs upon the termination of a life estate or other similar precedent property interest, except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 62 and in Section 63.

(h) Any interests in real property that vest in persons other than the trustor (or, pursuant to Section 63, his or her spouse) when a revocable trust becomes irrevocable.

(i) The transfer of stock of a cooperative housing corporation, vested with legal title to real property that conveys to the transferee the
 exclusive right to occupancy and possession of that property, or a portion thereof. A “cooperative housing corporation” is a real estate development in which membership in the corporation, by stock ownership, is coupled with the exclusive right to possess a portion of the real property.

(j) The transfer of any interest in real property between a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity and a shareholder, partner, or any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

62.

Change in ownership shall not include:

(a) (1) Any transfer between coowners that results in a change in the method of holding title to the real property transferred without changing the proportional interests of the coowners in that real property, such as a partition of a tenancy in common.

(2) Any transfer between an individual or individuals and a legal entity or between legal entities, such as a cotenancy to a partnership, a partnership to a corporation, or a trust to a cotenancy, that results solely in a change in the method of holding title to the real property and in which proportional ownership interests of the transferors
 and transferees, whether represented by stock, partnership interest, or otherwise, in each and every piece of real property transferred, remain the same after the transfer. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to transfers also excluded from change in ownership under the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 64.

(b) Any transfer for the purpose of perfecting title to the property.

(c) (1) The creation, assignment, termination, or reconveyance of a security interest; or (2) the substitution of a trustee under a security instrument.

(d) Any transfer by the trustor, or by the trustor’s spouse or registered domestic partner, or by both, into a trust for so long as (1) the transferor
 is the present beneficiary of the trust, or (2) the trust is revocable; or any transfer by a trustee of such a trust described in either clause (1) or (2) back to the trustor; or, any creation or termination of a trust in which the trustor retains the reversion and in which the interest of others does not exceed 12 years duration.

(e) Any transfer by an instrument whose terms reserve to the transferor an estate for years or an estate for life. However, the termination of such an estate for years or estate for life shall constitute a change in ownership, except as provided in subdivision (d) and in Section 63.

(f) The creation or transfer of a joint tenancy interest if the transferor, after the creation or transfer, is one of the joint tenants as provided in subdivision (b) of
 Section 65.

(g) Any transfer of a lessor’s interest in taxable real property subject to a lease with a remaining term (including renewal options) of 35 years or more. For the purpose of this subdivision, for 1979–80 and each year thereafter, it shall be conclusively presumed that all homes eligible for the homeowners’ exemption, other than manufactured homes located on rented or leased land and subject to taxation pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800) and floating homes subject to taxation pursuant to Section 229, that are on leased land have a renewal option of at least 35 years on the lease of that land, whether or not in fact that renewal option exists in any contract or agreement.

(h) Any purchase, redemption, or other transfer of the shares or units of
 participation of a group trust, common trust fund, pooled fund, or other collective investment fund established by a financial institution.

(i) Any transfer of stock or membership certificate in a housing cooperative that was financed under one mortgage, provided that mortgage was insured under Section 213, 221(d)(3), 221(d)(4), or 236 of the National Housing Act, as amended, or that housing cooperative was financed or assisted pursuant to Section 514, 515, or 516 of the Housing Act of 1949 or Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959, or the housing cooperative was financed by a direct loan from the California Housing Finance Agency, and provided that the regulatory and occupancy agreements were approved by the governmental lender or insurer, and provided that the transfer is to the housing cooperative or to a person or family qualifying for
 purchase by reason of limited income. Any subsequent transfer from the housing cooperative to a person or family not eligible for state or federal assistance in reduction of monthly carrying charges or interest reduction assistance by reason of the income level of that person or family shall constitute a change of ownership.

(j) Any transfer during the period March 1, 1975, to March 1, 1981, between coowners in any property that was held by them as coowners for all or part of that period, and which was eligible for a homeowner’s exemption during the period of the coownership, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter. Any transferee whose interest was revalued in contravention of the provisions of this subdivision shall obtain a reversal of that revaluation with respect to the 1980–81 assessment year and thereafter, upon application
 to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located filed on or before March 26, 1982. No refunds shall be made under this subdivision for any assessment year prior to the 1980–81 fiscal year.

(k) Any transfer of property or an interest therein between a corporation sole, a religious corporation, a public benefit corporation, and a holding corporation as defined in Section 23701h holding title for the benefit of any of these corporations, or any combination thereof (including any transfer from one entity to the same type of entity), provided that both the transferee and transferor are regulated by laws, rules, regulations, or canons of the same religious denomination.

(l) Any transfer, that would otherwise be a transfer subject to reappraisal under this
 chapter, between or among the same parties for the purpose of correcting or reforming a deed to express the true intentions of the parties, provided that the original relationship between the grantor and grantee is not changed.

(m) Any intrafamily transfer of an eligible dwelling unit from a parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians to a minor child or children or between or among minor siblings as a result of a court order or judicial decree due to the death of the parent or parents. As used in this subdivision, “eligible dwelling unit” means the dwelling unit that was the principal place of residence of the
 minor child or children prior to the transfer and remains the principal place of residence of the minor child or children after the transfer.

(n) Any transfer of an eligible dwelling unit, whether by will, devise, or inheritance, from a parent or parents to a child or children, or from a guardian or guardians to a ward or wards, if the child, children, ward, or wards have been disabled, as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 12304 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for at least five years preceding the transfer and if the child, children, ward, or wards have adjusted gross income that, when combined with the adjusted gross income of a spouse or spouses, parent or parents, and child or children, does not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in the year in which the transfer occurs. As used in this subdivision,
 “child” or “ward” includes a minor or an adult. As used in this subdivision, “eligible dwelling unit” means the dwelling unit that was the principal place of residence of the child or children, or ward or wards for at least five years preceding the transfer and remains the principal place of residence of the child or children, or ward or wards after the transfer. Any transferee whose property was reassessed in contravention of this subdivision for the 1984–85 assessment year shall obtain a reversal of that reassessment upon application to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located. Application by the transferee shall be made to the assessor no later than 30 days after the later of either the transferee’s receipt of notice of reassessment pursuant to Section 75.31 or the end of the 1984–85 fiscal year.

(o) Any
 transfer of a possessory interest in tax-exempt real property subject to a sublease with a remaining term, including renewal options, that exceeds half the length of the remaining term of the leasehold, including renewal options.

(p) (1) Commencing on January 1, 2000, any transfer between registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, including, but not limited to:

(A) Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a registered domestic partner, or the surviving registered domestic partner of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of such a trust to the registered domestic partner of the trustor.

(B) Transfers that take effect upon the death of a registered domestic
 partner.

(C) Transfers to a registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner in connection with a property settlement agreement or decree of dissolution of a registered domestic partnership or legal separation.

(D) The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between registered domestic partners, of any coowner’s interest.

(E) The distribution of a legal entity’s property to a registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner in exchange for the interest of the registered domestic partner in the legal entity in connection with a property settlement agreement or a decree of dissolution of a registered domestic partnership or legal separation.

(2) Any transferee whose property was reassessed in contravention of the provisions of this subdivision for a transfer occurring between January 1, 2000, and January 1, 2006, shall obtain a reversal of that reassessment upon application to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located. Application by the transferee shall be made to the assessor no later than June 30, 2009. A county may charge a fee for its costs related to the application and reassessment reversal in an amount that does not exceed the actual costs incurred. This paragraph shall be liberally construed to provide the benefits of this subdivision and Article XIII A of the California Constitution to registered domestic partners.

(A) After consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, the State Board of Equalization shall prescribe the form
 for claiming the reassessment reversal described in paragraph (2). The claim form shall be entitled “Claim for Reassessment Reversal for Registered Domestic Partners.” The claim shall state on its face that a “certificate of registered domestic partnership” is available upon request from the California Secretary of State.

(B) The information on the claim shall include a description of the property, the parties to the transfer of interest in the property, the date of the transfer of interest in the property, and a statement that the transferee registered domestic partner and the transferor registered domestic partner were, on the date of transfer, in a registered domestic partnership as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(C) The claimant shall declare that the information provided on the
 form is true, correct, and complete to the best of the claimant’s knowledge and belief.

(D) The claimant shall provide with the completed claim the “Certificate of Registered Domestic Partnership,” or photocopy thereof, naming the transferee and transferor as registered domestic partners and reflecting the creation of the registered domestic partnership on a date prior to, or concurrent with, the date of the transfer for which a reassessment reversal is requested.

(E) Any reassessment reversal granted pursuant to a claim shall apply commencing with the lien date of the assessment year, as defined in Section 118, in which the claim is filed. No refunds shall be made under this paragraph for any prior assessment year.

(F) Under any reassessment reversal granted pursuant to that claim, the adjusted full cash value of the subject real property in the assessment year described in subparagraph (E) shall be the adjusted base year value of the subject real property in the assessment year in which the excluded purchase or transfer took place, factored to the assessment year described in subparagraph (E) for both of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property.

(q) (1) Any transfer of property occurring on or after January 1, 2000, to June 26, 2015,
 inclusive, between local registered domestic partners, including, but not limited to:

(A) Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a local registered domestic partner, or the surviving local registered domestic partner of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of such a trust to the local registered domestic partner of the trustor.

(B) Transfers that take effect upon the death of a local registered domestic partner.

(C) Transfers to a local registered domestic partner or former local registered domestic partner in connection with a property settlement agreement or decree of dissolution of a local registered domestic partnership or legal separation.

(D) The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between local registered domestic partners, of any coowner’s interest.

(E) The distribution of a legal entity’s property to a local registered domestic partner or former local registered domestic partner in exchange for the interest of the local registered domestic partner in the legal entity in connection with a property settlement agreement or a decree of dissolution of a local registered domestic partnership or legal separation.

(2) Any transferee whose property was reassessed in contravention of this subdivision shall obtain a reversal of that reassessment upon application to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located. Application by the transferee shall be made to the assessor no later than June
 30, 2022. A county may charge a fee for its costs related to the application and reassessment reversal in an amount that does not exceed the actual costs incurred. This paragraph shall be liberally construed to provide the benefits of this subdivision and Article XIII A of the California Constitution to local registered domestic partners.

(A) After consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, the State Board of Equalization shall prescribe the form for claiming the reassessment reversal described in paragraph (2). The claim form shall be entitled “Claim for Reassessment Reversal for Local Registered Domestic Partners.”

(B) The information on the claim shall include a description of the property, the parties to the transfer of interest in the property, the date of the
 transfer of interest in the property, and a statement that the transferee local registered domestic partner and the transferor local registered domestic partner were, on the date of transfer, in a local registered domestic partnership as defined by paragraph (3).

(C) The claimant shall declare that the information provided on the form is true, correct, and complete to the best of their knowledge and belief.

(D) The claimant shall provide with the completed claim documentation naming the transferee and transferor as local registered domestic partners and reflecting the creation of the local registered domestic partnership on a date prior to, or concurrent with, the date of the transfer for which a reassessment reversal is requested.

(E) Any reassessment reversal granted pursuant to a claim shall apply commencing with the lien date of the assessment year, as defined in Section 118, in which the claim is filed. No refunds shall be made under this paragraph for any prior assessment year.

(F) Under any reassessment reversal granted pursuant to that claim, the adjusted full cash value of the subject real property in the assessment year described in subparagraph (E) shall be the adjusted base year value of the subject real property in the assessment year in which the excluded purchase or transfer took place, factored to the assessment year described in subparagraph (E) for both of the following:

(i) Inflation as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(ii) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “local registered domestic partner” means a registered domestic partnership established by a city, county, city and county, or special district in which both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The registrants were of the same sex at the time of registration.

(B) The registrants were not in a registered domestic partnership with, or married to, any other person at the time of the transfer.

(r) (1) Any parent to child transfer of stock in a qualified corporation
 that results in a change in ownership of a qualified property owned by the qualified corporation, provided that the transfer of stock is due to the death of a parent or parents.

(2) The assessor shall report quarterly to the State Board of Equalization all transfers for which a claim for exclusion is made for a qualified property pursuant to this subdivision and the amount of each exclusion claimed.

(3) The exclusion provided by this section shall apply only to a qualified property.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, both of the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Qualified corporation” means a corporation that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(i) Was created between March 1, 1975, and November 6, 1986, inclusive.

(ii) The corporation
 owns qualified property.

(iii) The only stockholders in the corporation have been the parents and their children.

(B) “Qualified property” means a parcel of land that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(i) Contains the principal place of residence of the parents prior to their death that has been the continuous place of residence of a child of those parents since the creation of the qualified
 corporation.

(ii) Its full cash value, as defined in Section 2 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution and Section 110.1, with any adjustments authorized by those sections, as of the date immediately prior to the date of death of the last surviving parent does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   (AB 872)   Effective October 9, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

62.1.

(a) Change in ownership shall not include the following:

(1) Any transfer, on or after January 1, 1985, of a mobilehome park to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, limited equity stock cooperative, or other entity formed by the tenants of a mobilehome park, for the purpose of purchasing the mobilehome park, provided that, with respect to any transfer of a mobilehome park on or after January 1, 1989, subject to this paragraph, the individual tenants who were renting at least 51 percent of the spaces in the mobilehome park prior to the transfer participate in the transaction through the ownership of an aggregate of at least 51 percent of the voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the
 entity which acquires the park. If, on or after January 1, 1998, a park is acquired by an entity that did not attain an initial tenant participation level of at least 51 percent on the date of the transfer, the entity shall have up to one year after the date of the transfer to attain a tenant participation level of at least 51 percent. If an individual tenant notifies the county assessor of the intention to comply with the conditions set forth in the preceding sentence, the mobilehome park may not be reappraised by the assessor during that period. However, if a tenant participation level of at least 51 percent is not attained within the one-year period, the county assessor shall thereafter levy escape assessments for the mobilehome park transfer.

(2) Any transfer or transfers on or after January 1, 1985, of rental spaces in a mobilehome park to the individual tenants of the rental spaces, provided that (1) at least 51 percent of the rental
 spaces are purchased by individual tenants renting their spaces prior to purchase, and (2) the individual tenants of these spaces form, within one year after the first purchase of a rental space by an individual tenant, a resident organization as described in subdivision (l) of Section 50781 of the Health and Safety Code, to operate and maintain the park. If, on or after January 1, 1985, an individual tenant or tenants notify the county assessor of the intention to comply with the conditions set forth in the preceding sentence, any mobilehome park rental space that is purchased by an individual tenant in that mobilehome park during that period shall not be reappraised by the assessor. However, if all of the conditions set forth in the first sentence of this paragraph are not satisfied, the county assessor shall thereafter levy escape assessments for the spaces so transferred. This paragraph shall apply only to those rental mobilehome parks that have been in operation for five years or more.

(b) (1) If the transfer of a mobilehome park has been excluded from a change in ownership pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the park has not been converted to condominium, stock cooperative ownership, or limited equity cooperative ownership, any transfer on or after January 1, 1989, of shares of the voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity that acquired the park in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be a change in ownership of a pro rata portion of the real property of the park unless the transfer is for the purpose of converting the park to condominium, stock cooperative ownership, or limited equity cooperative ownership or is excluded from change in ownership by Section 62, 63, 63.1, or 63.2.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “pro rata portion of the real property” means the total
 real property of the mobilehome park multiplied by a fraction consisting of the number of shares of voting stock, or other ownership or membership interests, transferred divided by the total number of outstanding issued or unissued shares of voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interests in, the entity that acquired the park in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) Any pro rata portion or portions of real property that changed ownership pursuant to this subdivision may be separately assessed as provided in Section 2188.10.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after an exclusion under subdivision (a), the assessor may not levy any escape or supplemental assessment with respect to any change in ownership of a pro rata portion of the real property of the mobilehome park that occurred between January 1, 1989, and
 January 1, 2002, and for which the assessor did not, prior to January 1, 2000, levy any assessments. However, commencing with the January 1, 2002, lien date, the assessor shall correct the base year value of the pro rata portion of the real property of the park to properly reflect these changes in ownership. A mobilehome park shall provide information requested by the assessor that is necessary to correct the base year value of the property for purposes of this paragraph.

(B) When an assessor corrects the base year value of the real property of the park pursuant to subparagraph (A), the assessor shall notify parks that residents may be eligible for property tax assistance programs offered by either the Controller or the Franchise Tax Board for senior citizens, or blind or disabled persons.

(C) Any outstanding taxes that were levied between January 1, 2000, and January 1, 2002, as
 a result of a pro rata change in ownership as described in subparagraph (A) shall be canceled. However, there shall be no refund of taxes, as so levied, that were paid prior to January 1, 2002.

(5) A mobilehome park that does not utilize recorded deeds to transfer ownership interest in the spaces or lots shall file, by February 1 of each year, a report with the county assessor’s office containing all of the following information:

(A) The full name and mailing address of each owner, stockholder, or holder of an ownership interest in the mobilehome park.

(B) The situs address, including space number, of each unit.

(C) The date that the ownership interest was acquired.

(D) If the unit is a
 manufactured home, the Department of Housing and Community Development decal number or serial number, or both, and whether the manufactured home is subject to the vehicle license fee or the local property tax.

(6) Within 30 days of a change in ownership, the new resident owner or other purchaser or transferee of a manufactured home within a mobilehome park that does not utilize recorded deeds to transfer ownership interest in the spaces or lots shall file a change in ownership statement described in either Section 480 or 480.2.

(7) Failure to comply with the reporting requirement described in paragraph (5) shall result in a penalty pursuant to Section 482.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in order to facilitate affordable conversions of mobilehome parks to tenant ownership, paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a) apply to all bona fide transfers of rental mobilehome parks to tenant ownership, including, but not limited to, those parks converted to tenant ownership as a nonprofit corporation made on or after January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   (SB 890)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

62.2.

(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), change in ownership shall not include any transfer on or after January 1, 1989, of a mobilehome park to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, tenant-in-common ownership group, or any other entity, including a governmental entity, if, within 18 months after the transfer, the mobilehome park is transferred by that corporation or other entity, including a governmental entity, to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, or other entity formed by the tenants of the mobilehome park in a transaction that is excluded from change in ownership by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 62.1, or at least 51 percent of the mobilehome park rental spaces are transferred to the individual tenants of those spaces in a transaction excluded from change in ownership by paragraph (2) subdivision (a) of Section 62.1.

(2) (A) Any mobilehome park that was initially transferred on or after January 1, 1993, to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, tenant-in-common ownership group, or any other entity, including a governmental entity, that is subsequently transferred within 36 months of that initial transfer as provided in paragraph (1), shall qualify for the exclusion from change in ownership pursuant to this subdivision. In applying the 36-month limit specified in the preceding sentence to the subsequent transfer to an individual tenant, as provided in paragraph (1), of a rental space in a mobilehome park that was initially transferred on or after January 1, 1995, to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, tenant-in-common ownership group, or any other entity, the execution of a purchase contract and the opening of a bona fide purchase escrow with a licensed escrow agent shall be deemed to transfer the rental space in compliance with that 36-month limit, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The escrow is opened prior to the expiration of the 36-month time period.

(ii) The escrow closes on a date no later than six months after the end of the 36-month time period.

(B) A mobilehome park located within a disaster area that was initially transferred on or after October 1, 1991, and before October 31, 1991, to a nonprofit corporation, stock cooperative corporation, or other entity, that is subsequently transferred within 76 months of that initial transfer as provided in paragraph (1), shall qualify for the exclusion from change in ownership pursuant to this subdivision. For purposes of the preceding sentence, “mobilehome park located within a disaster area” means a mobilehome park that is located in the County of Los Angeles in an area for which both of the following apply:

(i) The Governor, as a result of the January 17, 1994, Northridge earthquake, has declared the area to be in a state of disaster and certified the area’s need for assistance.

(ii) The President of the United States has, pursuant to federal law, determined the area to be in a state of major disaster.

The exclusion from change in ownership pursuant to this subdivision of a mobilehome park located within a disaster area shall be effective commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, and shall not require any affected county to refund any amount of property tax levied with respect to a mobilehome park for the period from October 1, 1991, to June 30, 1995, inclusive.

(b) With respect to any transfer of any mobilehome park on or after January 1, 1989, subject to this section, the individual tenants who are renting at least a majority of the spaces in the mobilehome park prior to the transfer to the entity formed by the tenants for the acquisition of the park shall participate in the transaction through the ownership of an aggregate of at least a majority of voting stock of, or other ownership or membership interest in, that entity.

(c) This section shall not apply if any fees charged the mobilehome park tenants in connection with either the first or second transfer exceed 15 percent of the total consideration paid for the mobilehome park in the first transfer, plus any accrued interest and taxes.

(d) If the assessor is notified in writing at the time the transferee files the change in ownership statement that the transferee intends to qualify the transfer under this section, the mobilehome park shall not be reappraised pending satisfaction of the relevant conditions set forth in this section for exclusion from change in ownership. If the transferee fails to satisfy those conditions, the assessor shall reappraise the mobilehome park and levy escape assessments or supplemental assessments, as appropriate. For escape or supplemental assessments levied pursuant to the preceding sentence with respect to a mobilehome park located within a disaster area, both of the following conditions shall apply:

(1) The limitations period shall be that period specified in either subdivision (b) of Section 532 or subdivision (d) of Section 75.11, as applicable.

(2) For purposes of applying the limitations periods specified in paragraph (1), the expiration date of the 76-month period specified in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be the date upon which the initial transfer of the mobilehome park was reported to the assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

62.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, a change in ownership shall not include a transfer of a cotenancy interest in real property from one cotenant to the other that takes effect upon the death of the transferor cotenant if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The transfer is solely by and between two individuals who together own 100 percent of the real property in joint tenancy or as tenants in common.

(2) As a result of the death of the transferor cotenant, the deceased cotenant’s tenancy in common or joint tenancy interest in the real property is transferred to the surviving cotenant, which results in the
 surviving cotenant holding a 100-percent ownership interest in the real property immediately after the transfer, thereby terminating the cotenancy.

(3) For the one-year period immediately preceding the transfer, the real property was coowned by the transferor and the transferee, and both cotenants have been the owners of record of that real property.

(4) The real property constituted the principal residence of both cotenants immediately preceding the transferor cotenant’s death.

(5) The transferor and the transferee continuously resided at that residence for the one-year period immediately preceding the transfer.

(6) The transferee has signed, under penalty of perjury, an affidavit affirming that he or she continuously resided with the transferor at the
 residence for the one-year period immediately preceding the transfer.

(b) A transfer of cotenancy interest in real property from one cotenant to the other shall take effect upon the death of the transferor cotenant under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Pursuant to the transferor cotenant’s will or trust, upon the death of the transferor cotenant.

(2) Through intestate succession from the transferor cotenant.

(3) By operation of law, upon the death of the transferor cotenant.

(c) The exclusion provided by this section shall not apply to any transfer of real property interests for which a separate exclusion in this chapter applies.

(d) For purposes of this section, both of the following apply:

(1) “Cotenancy interest” means an interest in real property held only as tenants in common or joint tenants.

(2) “Principal residence” means a dwelling eligible for either the homeowners’ exemption or the disabled veterans’ exemption.

(e) This section shall only apply to transfers that occur on or after January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (AB 1700)   Effective September 29, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

62.5.
